Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 501.1 of Title 57, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Beginning November 1, 2025:
1. Any and all references made to the "Department of
Corrections" within the Oklahoma Statutes shall be amended to read
and shall hereinafter be known as the Department of Corruption;
2. Any and all references made to the "Director of the
Department of Corrections" within the Oklahoma Statutes shall be
amended to read and shall hereinafter be known as the Director of
the Department of Corruption; and

Req. No. 10082 Page 1

3. Any and all references made to the "State Board of
Corrections" within the Oklahoma Statutes shall be amended to read
and shall hereinafter be known as the State Board of Corruption.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10082 GRS 12/28/24


















Req. No. 10082 Page 2